Massachusetts, session 194th, S1423.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 40Y the 
2 following chapter:-  
3  Chapter 40Z. TRANSIT IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS.  
4  Section 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this chapter, the following words shall, unless 
5 the context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:  
6  “Fee”, a payment for services or improvements within a TID.  
7  “Lead municipality”, the municipality exercising managerial control over the TID, as 
8 designated by the group of municipalities participating in the establishment of a TID.  

2 of 12 9  “Municipal executive body”, the mayor or city manager in a city or the board of 
10 selectmen, town manager, or town administrator in a town.  
11  “Municipal legislative body”, the city council or board of alderman in a city or the town 
12 meeting in a town.  
13  “Partners”, the businesses, entities, municipalities, districts, regional entities, and state 
14 agencies participating in a TID.  
15  “Program plan”, a statement of means and objectives for providing the capital, 
16 operational facilities, and resources to improve transit, transportation, and quality of life within a 
17 TID.  
18  “TID”, a transit improvement district formed pursuant to this chapter, which is a 
19 specified area within 1 or more municipalities that shall consist of 2 or more parcels or lots of 
20 land, whether or not contiguous, or 2 or more buildings or structures, whether or not adjacent, on 
21 2 or more parcels of land; provided, that the total area of all TIDs within a municipality shall not 
22 exceed 25 per cent of the total area of the municipality.  
23  “Transit improvement program” a transit project that implements transit improvements 
24 upon existing transportation services within a TID.  
25  Section 2. Program Plan and TID Adoption Requirements  
26  (a) Prior to establishing a TID, a municipality or group of municipalities shall develop a 
27 program plan describing said TID’s means and objectives. At a minimum, the program plan shall 
28 include:  

3 of 12 29  (1) a financial plan that describes the costs and sources of revenue required to establish 
30 transit improvement programs within a TID, including cost estimates for the transit improvement 
31 programs, the amount of indebtedness, if any, to be incurred, and any sources of anticipated 
32 capital; provided, that the financial plan’s cost estimates may include any of the following types 
33 of costs: (i) administrative costs, including any reasonable charges for the time spent by town 
34 employees in connection with the implementation of a transit improvement program and for 
35 committing the assessment, collections of fees and payment enforcement; (ii) capital costs, 
36 including the costs of the construction of public works or improvements, new buildings, 
37 structures and fixtures, the demolition, alteration, remodeling, repair or reconstruction of existing 
38 buildings, structures or fixtures, the acquisition of equipment, or the grading and clearing of 
39 land; (iii) discretionary costs, including any payments made by a municipal entity that, in its 
40 discretion, are necessary for the creation of TID or the implementation of a transit improvement 
41 program; (iv) financing costs, including all interest paid to holders of evidences of indebtedness 
42 issued to pay for transit improvement program costs and any premium paid over the principal 
43 amount of that indebtedness because of the redemption of the obligations before maturity; (v) 
44 information costs, including any costs associated with promoting and advertising the transit 
45 improvement programs, providing public safety information, disseminating transit schedules, or 
46 providing other forms of information necessary to the transit operations of a TID; (vi) 
47 management costs, including costs incurred by establishing and maintaining TID administrative 
48 and managerial support and other services, as necessary or appropriate, to provide transit 
49 improvement programs; or (vii) professional service costs, including any costs incurred for 
50 consultants, planning, engineering, architectural, or legal advice, or other services related to 
51 providing transit improvement programs;  

4 of 12 52  (2) a list of the necessary capital and operational resources to be procured and public 
53 facilities, if any, to be constructed;  
54  (3) identification of the use, if any, of private property for transit improvement programs;  
55  (4) identification of the municipal department responsible for administering the transit 
56 improvement programs; provided, that for a program involving a TID consisting of more than 1 
57 municipality, the program plan shall designate a lead municipality responsible for managing the 
58 program;  
59  (5) a proposed management and operational plan regarding transit service delivery within 
60 the TID, which may include contracting for transit service management with an existing regional 
61 transit authority, a transportation management association, or a private service entity;  
62  (6) the duration of any transit improvement programs, which shall be a minimum of 3 
63 years and shall not exceed 6 years after the transit service start date;  
64  (7) a list of the entities participating as partners in a transit improvement program;  
65  (8) the means for setting policy and making decisions related to the transit improvement 
66 program;  
67  (9) the target start date for the collection of funds and initiation of transit service within 
68 the TID;  
69  (10) a careful consideration of how the TID can fill public transportation gaps not 
70 currently provided by publicly accessible local, regional, or state transit services; and  

5 of 12 71  (11) a proposal for communication and collaboration between any municipalities 
72 involved in establishing the TID, any regional transit authorities and transportation management 
73 associations with relevant jurisdiction, any applicable regional planning authority, the 
74 surrounding business community and housing providers, and the Massachusetts department of 
75 transportation.  
76  A municipality or group of municipalities that has developed a program plan shall hold a 
77 public meeting to consider the merits of the program plan prior to its submittal for adoption. 
78 Notice of said public meeting shall be sent to all relevant regional planning authorities and 
79 regional transit authorities a minimum of ten days in advance.  
80  A separate program plan shall be adopted for each proposed TID. The program plan shall 
81 be adopted at the same time as the TID, as part of the TID adoption proceedings pursuant to 
82 subsection (b) of this section or, if at a different time, in the same manner as the adoption of the 
83 TID, with the same requirements of subsection (b). Once adopted, a program plan shall only be 
84 substantially altered or amended after meeting the same requirements for adoption.  
85  (b) A municipality or group of municipalities may, after the development of a program 
86 plan and a public meeting on the merits of said plan pursuant to subsection (a), establish a TID, 
87 as defined in section 1, within the boundaries of said municipality or municipalities by:  
88  (1) a majority vote of the appropriate municipal legislative body of each participating 
89 municipality; provided, that the municipal legislative body of each participating municipality 
90 finds that the establishment of the TID is in the public’s best interest; and  
91  (2) a vote of the property owners subject to the fee provided for in section 5 within said 
92 TID, where a minimum of 51 per cent of property owners shall be required to vote in the 

6 of 12 93 affirmative and said voters casting ballots in the affirmative shall constitute at least 51 per cent of 
94 the total assessed value of land of fee-paying properties in said TID; provided, that ballots for 
95 such vote shall be sent by certified mail to each property owner in accordance with the mailing 
96 address officially on file with the municipal assessor.   
97  Nothing in this section shall prevent a TID from including more than 1 municipality; 
98 provided, however, that each participating municipality shall vote affirmatively for the 
99 establishment of said TID pursuant to the requirements under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this 
100 subsection. If any of the municipalities considering establishment of a TID fail to meet the 
101 requirements under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, a TID shall not be established.  
102  (c) Any vote by a municipal legislative body under paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this 
103 section shall include:  
104  (1) a declaration that management authority over a TID rest with the municipal executive 
105 body or, where a group of municipalities are establishing a TID, the municipal executive body of 
106 the lead municipality;  
107  (2) a designation of the municipal department under whose authority funds may be 
108 expended under section 5; provided, that said designation shall reference the applicable program 
109 plan and require that all funds be spent in a manner consistent with said plan;  
110  (3) a statement describing the methodology used for the calculation of any proposed 
111 transit improvement fees pursuant to section 5;   
112  (4) a designation of the source of the municipal matching funds and an authorization for 
113 the appropriation of said funds; and  

7 of 12 114  (5) a designation, if the transit improvement program is in a TID involving more than 1 
115 municipality, of which municipality shall be the lead municipality for the purposes of managing 
116 said transit improvement program.  
117  Section 3. At any time after the establishment of a TID pursuant to section 2, the district 
118 boundaries may be amended by an affirmative vote of the municipal legislative body of each 
119 participating municipality.  
120  Section 4. The rights and powers of a TID shall include: developing, managing, and 
121 maintaining transit improvement programs; establishing and collecting fees pursuant to section 
122 5; leasing, owning, acquiring, or optioning real property; undertaking collections and 
123 enforcement of fines associated with the collection of fees; providing planning and design 
124 services; formulating a fee structure; accumulating interest; incurring costs or indebtedness; 
125 entering into contracts; suing and being sued; employing legal and accounting services; 
126 undertaking planning, feasibility and market analyses; developing common marketing and 
127 promotional activities; or engaging in other supplemental services or programs that would further 
128 the purposes of this chapter.  
129  Section 5. (a) A transit improvement fee may be collected and used solely to fund items 
130 to further the goals identified and approved in a TID program plan and spent in accordance with 
131 the provisions of this chapter.   
132  A transit improvement fee shall be determined by a formula consisting of any 
133 combination of the following:  
134  (1) different fee levels for varying classifications of real property;  

8 of 12 135  (2) a fee based on a percentage of the assessed value provided that the fee cannot exceed 
136 5 per cent of the existing annual tax assessment;  
137  (3) a fee per employee;  
138  (4) a fee per parking space on the site;  
139  (5) a fee per single occupancy vehicle (SOV) trip generated to the site under its current or 
140 anticipated use;  
141  (6) a fee per residential unit within a multifamily parcel;  
142  (7) a fee for service as may be designed to accommodate a specific user or entity; or  
143  (8) any other formula that meets the objectives of the TID.  
144  (b) A TID may, in the establishment of a fee structure, elect to exempt any or all of the 
145 following property types:  
146  (1) residential dwellings, whether or not they are owner occupied, provided they do not 
147 exceed 3 residential units in the same structure;  
148  (2) small commercial properties of up to 5,000 gross square feet per building; or  
149  (3) agricultural properties.  
150  (c) The collector-treasurer of the municipality where a TID is located is hereby 
151 authorized to collect transit improvement fees and disburse the funds to the duly authorized and 
152 designated municipal department identified under subsection (c) of section 2. If the TID contains 
153 more than 1 municipality, it shall be the responsibility of the collector-treasurer in each 

9 of 12 154 municipality to collect the fee and remit to the lead community. The collector-treasurer of each 
155 participating municipality shall be authorized to levy fines for non-payment of fees and, if 
156 necessary, to pursue appropriate legal action for said enforcement.  
157  The collector-treasurer shall disburse revenues to the designated municipal department 
158 within 60 days of the collection of transit improvement fees.   
159  (d) Following establishment of a TID, all fees billed by or on behalf of a TID and unpaid 
160 by the obligor after 60 days from the date of billing shall become a lien in favor of the 
161 municipality on the real property of the obligor in an amount sufficient to satisfy all unpaid fees, 
162 which shall have priority over all other liens except municipal liens and mortgages of record 
163 prior to the recording of a notice of lien, if notice of the lien is duly recorded by the municipality 
164 in the appropriate registry of deeds or land court registry district.  
165  (e) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, transit improvement fees 
166 collected by a municipality under this chapter shall not be deemed to be part of the 
167 municipality’s regular levy collections and shall not be subject to the requirements of section 
168 21C of chapter 59.   
169  Section 5A. (a) A property owner subject to an exemption pursuant to clause Third or 
170 clause Eleventh of section 5 of chapter 59 shall not be subject to the fee provided for in section 
171 5; provided, however, that such property owner shall have all the rights and privileges as any 
172 other property owner pursuant to this chapter if such property owner participates in the voluntary 
173 payment program set forth in subsection (b).  
174  (b) A property owner of property located within a TID and subject to an exemption in 
175 clause Third or clause Eleventh of section 5 of chapter 59 may enter into an agreement with the 

10 of 12 176 municipal executive body in which such property is located for voluntary payments to such 
177 municipality for the purposes of this chapter.  
178  The TID shall establish the amount of and terms of such payment agreement based on 
179 factors that include, but are not limited to: (1) the assessed value of the real property; (2) 
180 community benefits provided by the property owner such as the property owner’s contribution to 
181 transportation goals and programs of the TID; (3) the total assets of the property owner, 
182 including but not limited to, land, buildings and equipment; and (4) total annual revenues.  
183  Section 5B. (a) Any regional transit authority or property owner subject to an exemption 
184 under Chapter 161B Section 13 shall not be subject to the fee provided for in section 5; provided, 
185 however, that such regional transit authority or property owner shall have all the rights and 
186 privileges as any other property owner pursuant to this chapter if such property owner 
187 participates in the voluntary payment program set forth in subsection (b).  
188  (b) Any regional transit authority or property owner of property located within a TID and 
189 subject to an exemption under Chapter 161B Section 13 may enter into an agreement with the 
190 municipal executive body in which such property is located for voluntary payments to such 
191 municipality for the purposes of this chapter.  
192  Section 6. The municipality or group of municipalities participating in the establishment 
193 of a TID shall provide a minimum of 25 per cent of the TID’s program costs from funds not 
194 generated by the fees authorized under section 5. The Massachusetts department of 
195 transportation shall provide 25 per cent in matching funds, subject to appropriation. Users of the 
196 new transit improvement program shall be required to pay a fee for service, which shall, in the 

11 of 12 197 aggregate, be no more than 5 per cent of the total program costs. Property owners located within 
198 a TID shall provide a minimum of 25 per cent of the transit improvement program costs.   
199  Section 7. The municipal executive body authorized to manage a TID under paragraph 
200 (1) of subsection (c) of section 2 shall conduct a review of the program plan 12 months prior to 
201 the completion of the duration of the transit improvement programs within a TID to determine if 
202 the program is desired to be continued, and if so, complete a program assessment that includes a 
203 review of the anticipated costs to continue said service. If continuance is sought, a public hearing 
204 shall be conducted on the TID’s desire to continue service and a renewal of the authorization 
205 shall be approved by the relevant municipal legislative body or bodies in a manner consistent 
206 with the authorization set forth in section 2.   
207  Section 8. A TID may be dissolved by petition to the local municipal executive body and 
208 a subsequent decision by its legislative body to authorize dissolution, or a TID may be dissolved 
209 upon request by the chief elected or chief executive official of the lead municipality for a 
210 dissolution vote by the local municipal legislative body.  
211  In order to be considered by a municipal legislative body, a petition to dissolve a TID 
212 shall contain the signatures of the fee-paying property owners whose properties represent at least 
213 51 per cent of the total assessed value within the TID and at least 51 per cent of the fee-paying 
214 property owners within the TID.  
215  The municipal executive body shall hold a public hearing within 30 days of receipt of a 
216 completed dissolution petition.  
217  Following the public hearing, the municipal executive body shall refer the matter to its 
218 legislative body, which may determine, by a majority vote, to dissolve the TID; provided, 

12 of 12 219 however, that no TID shall be dissolved until it has satisfied or paid in full all of its outstanding 
220 indebtedness, obligations, and liabilities, or until funds are on deposit and available therefor, or 
221 until a repayment schedule has been formulated and municipally approved therefor. The TID 
222 shall be prohibited from incurring any new or increased financial obligations after its dissolution.  
223  Upon the dissolution of a TID, any remaining revenues derived from the sale of assets 
224 acquired with fees collected shall be refunded to the property owners in the TID in which fees 
225 were charged by applying the same formula used to calculate the fee in the fiscal year in which 
226 the TID is dissolved.  
227  In the event a municipality participating in a TID containing more than 1 municipality 
228 desires to withdraw from the TID, such municipality may, by petition containing the signatures 
229 of the fee-paying owners whose properties represent at least 51 per cent of the assessed value 
230 within the TID and at least 51 per cent of the fee-paying property owners within the district, seek 
231 a dissolution vote from its municipal legislative body. Upon such approval from a municipal 
232 legislative body, the withdrawing municipality shall then also receive an affirmative vote of the 
233 lead municipality’s legislative body, in order to effectuate the withdrawal.   
234  SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, upon passage of 
235 this act, the Massachusetts department of transportation shall identify and set aside funding to be 
236 used to meet its responsibilities under section 6 of chapter 40X, and shall establish a fund to 
237 assist any municipality or group of municipalities in establishing a transit improvement district, 
238 as defined in section 1 of chapter 40X; provided, that at least 35 per cent of the funds disbursed 
239 from said fund shall be used over a 5 year period to fund projects in low-income communities, 
240 the city of Boston, and gateway municipalities as defined in section 3A of chapter 23A.